Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SENIOR NUTRITION PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin $11,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $11,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for senior nutrition programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 256.9752. new text end